Nevada, session 83, SB153.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 453.333 is hereby amended to read as follows:
453.333 1. If the death of a person is proximately caused by a
controlled substance which was sold, given, traded or otherwise
made available to him or her by another person in violation of this
chapter, the person who sold, gave or traded or otherwise made the
substance available to him or her is guilty of murder. If convicted of
murder in the second degree, the person is guilty of a category A
felony and shall be punished as provided in subsection 5 of NRS
200.030. If convicted of murder in the first degree, the person is
guilty of a category A felony and shall be punished as provided in
subsection 4 of NRS 200.030, except that the punishment of death
may be imposed only if the requirements of paragraph (a) of
subsection 4 of that section have been met and if the defendant is or
has previously been convicted of violating NRS 453.3385, 453.3387
or 453.339 or a law of any other jurisdiction which prohibits the
same conduct.
2. For the purposes of this section:
(a) The act of selling, giving, trading or otherwise making
available a controlled substance to another person in violation of
this chapter shall be deemed to be inherently dangerous as a
matter of law; and
(b) The death of a person to whom a controlled substance has
been sold, given, traded or otherwise made available in violation of
this chapter shall be deemed to be a natural and probable
consequence of the violation of this chapter.
3. As used in this section, “proximately caused” means a
natural sequence that produced the death and without which the
death would not have occurred. The term does not require proof
that the controlled substance is the sole cause of death, but the
controlled substance must be the primary cause of death.
Sec. 2. NRS 200.030 is hereby amended to read as follows:
200.030 1. Murder of the first degree is murder which is:
(a) Perpetrated by means of poison, lying in wait or torture, or
by any other kind of willful, deliberate and premeditated killing;
(b) Committed in the perpetration or attempted perpetration of
sexual assault, kidnapping, arson, robbery, burglary, invasion of the
home, sexual abuse of a child, sexual molestation of a child under
the age of 14 years, child abuse or abuse of an older person or
vulnerable person pursuant to NRS 200.5099;
(c) Committed to avoid or prevent the lawful arrest of any
person by a peace officer or to effect the escape of any person from
legal custody;
-
*SB153*

– 3 –
(d) Committed on the property of a public or private school, at
an activity sponsored by a public or private school or on a school
bus while the bus was engaged in its official duties by a person who
intended to create a great risk of death or substantial bodily harm to
more than one person by means of a weapon, device or course of
action that would normally be hazardous to the lives of more than
one person; [or]
(e) Committed in the perpetration or attempted perpetration of
an act of terrorism [.] ; or
(f) Committed pursuant to NRS 453.333 if the controlled
substance sold, given, traded or otherwise made available is
fentanyl, a derivative of fentanyl or any mixture which contains
fentanyl or any derivative of fentanyl.
2. Murder of the second degree is all other kinds of murder.
3. The jury before whom any person indicted for murder is
tried shall, if they find the person guilty thereof, designate by their
verdict whether the person is guilty of murder of the first or second
degree.
4. A person convicted of murder of the first degree is guilty of
a category A felony and shall be punished:
(a) By death, only if one or more aggravating circumstances are
found and any mitigating circumstance or circumstances which are
found do not outweigh the aggravating circumstance or
circumstances, unless a court has made a finding pursuant to NRS
174.098 that the defendant is a person with an intellectual disability
and has stricken the notice of intent to seek the death penalty; or
(b) By imprisonment in the state prison:
(1) For life without the possibility of parole;
(2) For life with the possibility of parole, with eligibility for
parole beginning when a minimum of 20 years has been served; or
(3) For a definite term of 50 years, with eligibility for parole
beginning when a minimum of 20 years has been served.
 A determination of whether aggravating circumstances exist is
not necessary to fix the penalty at imprisonment for life with or
without the possibility of parole.
5. A person convicted of murder of the second degree is guilty
of a category A felony and shall be punished by imprisonment in the
state prison:
(a) For life with the possibility of parole, with eligibility for
parole beginning when a minimum of 10 years has been served; or
(b) For a definite term of 25 years, with eligibility for parole
beginning when a minimum of 10 years has been served.
6. As used in this section:
(a) “Act of terrorism” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 202.4415;
-
*SB153*

– 4 –
(b) “Child abuse” means physical injury of a nonaccidental
nature to a child under the age of 18 years;
(c) “School bus” has the meaning ascribed to it in NRS 483.160;
(d) “Sexual abuse of a child” means any of the acts described in
NRS 432B.100; and
(e) “Sexual molestation” means any willful and lewd or
lascivious act, other than acts constituting the crime of sexual
assault, upon or with the body, or any part or member thereof, of a
child under the age of 14 years, with the intent of arousing,
appealing to, or gratifying the lust, passions or sexual desires of the
perpetrator or of the child.
H
-
*SB153*